Hawaii, session 2026, HB2233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the federal supplemental nutrition assistance programeducation (SNAP-Ed) program, active from 1992 until its discontinuation in 2025, was a critical, evidence-based program that directly improved the health and well-being of low-income families.  SNAP-Ed provided essential nutrition education, promoted healthy eating, improved cooking and budgeting skills, and expanded access to nutritious foods. The legislature further finds that SNAP-Ed program outcomes demonstrate positive impact, with ninety-one per cent of participants improving their diets, eighty-three per cent of participants gaining skills in meal planning and budgeting, and forty per cent reporting increased food affordability or sufficient food for their families.  The SNAP-Ed program reduced food insecurity and risks of diet-related disease, delivering tangible benefits across communities. The legislature additionally finds that the SNAP-Ed program also strengthened local food systems, supported schools and community organizations.  Nutrition education also is a cost-effective investment that prevents illness, reduces long-term health spending, and strengthens families and communities. The legislature notes that at the state level, the university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resilience and the department of health manage SNAP-Ed programs with a combined 1,570,000,000 budget for 2025.  However, the federal SNAP-Ed program has been eliminated from the federal budget, dismantling a proven, prevention-focused program at a time of rising food costs and escalating public health expenditures and leaving the future of the program at risk in the State and nationally. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resilience and the department of health to continue funding for the Hawaii supplemental nutrition assistance programeducation program. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resilience to continue implementation of the Hawaii supplemental nutrition assistance programeducation program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of health to continue implementation of the Hawaii supplemental nutrition assistance programeducation program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________